Atelier/dicollect/fr-dicollecte-daily-classique-reforme1990-v2012-12-27.aff
FLAG long
SFX pS Y 167
SFX pS oir oir/n'q'd'l'm't's' oir is:infi
SFX pS sseoir sseyant/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:ppre
SFX pS ssoir sseyant/n'q'l'm't's' soir is:ppre
SFX pS sseoir ssoyant/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:ppre
SFX pS ssoir ssoyant/n'q'l'm't's' soir is:ppre
SFX pS sseoir ssis/q' seoir is:ppas is:mas is:inv
SFX pS sseoir ssise/q' seoir is:ppas is:fem
SFX pS sseoir ssises/q' seoir is:ppas is:fem is:pl
SFX pS ssoir ssis/q' soir is:ppas is:mas is:inv
SFX pS ssoir ssise/q' soir is:ppas is:fem
SFX pS ssoir ssises/q' soir is:ppas is:fem is:pl
SFX pS sseoir ssieds/n'q'j'l'm't' seoir is:ipre is:1sg
SFX pS sseoir ssieds/n'q'l'm't' seoir is:ipre is:2sg
SFX pS sseoir ssied/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:ipre is:3sg
SFX pS sseoir sseyons/n'q'l't' seoir is:ipre is:1pl
SFX pS sseoir sseyez/n'q'l'm' seoir is:ipre is:2pl
SFX pS sseoir sseyent/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:ipre is:3pl
SFX pS sseoir ssois/n'q'j'l'm't' seoir is:ipre is:1sg
SFX pS sseoir ssois/n'q'l'm't' seoir is:ipre is:2sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoit/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:ipre is:3sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoyons/n'q'l't' seoir is:ipre is:1pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoyez/n'q'l'm' seoir is:ipre is:2pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoient/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:ipre is:3pl
SFX pS ssoir ssieds/n'q'j'l'm't' soir is:ipre is:1sg
SFX pS ssoir ssieds/n'q'l'm't' soir is:ipre is:2sg
SFX pS ssoir ssied/n'q'l'm't's' soir is:ipre is:3sg
SFX pS ssoir sseyons/n'q'l't' soir is:ipre is:1pl
SFX pS ssoir sseyez/n'q'l'm' soir is:ipre is:2pl
SFX pS ssoir sseyent/n'q'l'm't's' soir is:ipre is:3pl
SFX pS ssoir ssois/n'q'j'l'm't' soir is:ipre is:1sg
SFX pS ssoir ssois/n'q'l'm't' soir is:ipre is:2sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoit/n'q'l'm't's' soir is:ipre is:3sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoyons/n'q'l't' soir is:ipre is:1pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoyez/n'q'l'm' soir is:ipre is:2pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoient/n'q'l'm't's' soir is:ipre is:3pl
SFX pS sseoir sseyais/n'q'j'l'm't' seoir is:iimp is:1sg
SFX pS sseoir sseyais/n'q'l'm't' seoir is:iimp is:2sg
SFX pS sseoir sseyait/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:iimp is:3sg
SFX pS sseoir sseyions/n'q'l't' seoir is:iimp is:1pl
SFX pS sseoir sseyiez/n'q'l'm' seoir is:iimp is:2pl
SFX pS sseoir sseyaient/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:iimp is:3pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoyais/n'q'j'l'm't' seoir is:iimp is:1sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoyais/n'q'l'm't' seoir is:iimp is:2sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoyait/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:iimp is:3sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoyions/n'q'l't' seoir is:iimp is:1pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoyiez/n'q'l'm' seoir is:iimp is:2pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoyaient/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:iimp is:3pl
SFX pS ssoir sseyais/n'q'j'l'm't' soir is:iimp is:1sg
SFX pS ssoir sseyais/n'q'l'm't' soir is:iimp is:2sg
SFX pS ssoir sseyait/n'q'l'm't's' soir is:iimp is:3sg
SFX pS ssoir sseyions/n'q'l't' soir is:iimp is:1pl
SFX pS ssoir sseyiez/n'q'l'm' soir is:iimp is:2pl
SFX pS ssoir sseyaient/n'q'l'm't's' soir is:iimp is:3pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoyais/n'q'j'l'm't' soir is:iimp is:1sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoyais/n'q'l'm't' soir is:iimp is:2sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoyait/n'q'l'm't's' soir is:iimp is:3sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoyions/n'q'l't' soir is:iimp is:1pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoyiez/n'q'l'm' soir is:iimp is:2pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoyaient/n'q'l'm't's' soir is:iimp is:3pl
SFX pS sseoir ssis/n'q'j'l'm't' seoir is:ipsi is:1sg
SFX pS sseoir ssis/n'q'l'm't' seoir is:ipsi is:2sg
SFX pS sseoir ssit/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX pS sseoir ssîmes/n'q'l't' seoir is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX pS sseoir ssîtes/n'q'l'm' seoir is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX pS sseoir ssirent/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:ipsi is:3pl
SFX pS ssoir ssis/n'q'j'l'm't' soir is:ipsi is:1sg
SFX pS ssoir ssis/n'q'l'm't' soir is:ipsi is:2sg
SFX pS ssoir ssit/n'q'l'm't's' soir is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX pS ssoir ssîmes/n'q'l't' soir is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX pS ssoir ssîtes/n'q'l'm' soir is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX pS ssoir ssirent/n'q'l'm't's' soir is:ipsi is:3pl
SFX pS sseoir ssiérai/n'q'j'l'm't' seoir is:ifut is:1sg
SFX pS sseoir ssiéras/n'q'l'm't' seoir is:ifut is:2sg
SFX pS sseoir ssiéra/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:ifut is:3sg
SFX pS sseoir ssiérons/n'q'l't' seoir is:ifut is:1pl
SFX pS sseoir ssiérez/n'q'l'm' seoir is:ifut is:2pl
SFX pS sseoir ssiéront/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:ifut is:3pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoirai/n'q'j'l'm't' seoir is:ifut is:1sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoiras/n'q'l'm't' seoir is:ifut is:2sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoira/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:ifut is:3sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoirons/n'q'l't' seoir is:ifut is:1pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoirez/n'q'l'm' seoir is:ifut is:2pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoiront/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:ifut is:3pl
SFX pS ssoir ssiérai/n'q'j'l'm't' soir is:ifut is:1sg
SFX pS ssoir ssiéras/n'q'l'm't' soir is:ifut is:2sg
SFX pS ssoir ssiéra/n'q'l'm't's' soir is:ifut is:3sg
SFX pS ssoir ssiérons/n'q'l't' soir is:ifut is:1pl
SFX pS ssoir ssiérez/n'q'l'm' soir is:ifut is:2pl
SFX pS ssoir ssiéront/n'q'l'm't's' soir is:ifut is:3pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoirai/n'q'j'l'm't' soir is:ifut is:1sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoiras/n'q'l'm't' soir is:ifut is:2sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoira/n'q'l'm't's' soir is:ifut is:3sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoirons/n'q'l't' soir is:ifut is:1pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoirez/n'q'l'm' soir is:ifut is:2pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoiront/n'q'l'm't's' soir is:ifut is:3pl
SFX pS sseoir ssiérais/n'q'j'l'm't' seoir is:cond is:1sg
SFX pS sseoir ssiérais/n'q'l'm't' seoir is:cond is:2sg
SFX pS sseoir ssiérait/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:cond is:3sg
SFX pS sseoir ssiérions/n'q'l't' seoir is:cond is:1pl
SFX pS sseoir ssiériez/n'q'l'm' seoir is:cond is:2pl
SFX pS sseoir ssiéraient/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:cond is:3pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoirais/n'q'j'l'm't' seoir is:cond is:1sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoirais/n'q'l'm't' seoir is:cond is:2sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoirait/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:cond is:3sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoirions/n'q'l't' seoir is:cond is:1pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoiriez/n'q'l'm' seoir is:cond is:2pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoiraient/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:cond is:3pl
SFX pS ssoir ssiérais/n'q'j'l'm't' soir is:cond is:1sg
SFX pS ssoir ssiérais/n'q'l'm't' soir is:cond is:2sg
SFX pS ssoir ssiérait/n'q'l'm't's' soir is:cond is:3sg
SFX pS ssoir ssiérions/n'q'l't' soir is:cond is:1pl
SFX pS ssoir ssiériez/n'q'l'm' soir is:cond is:2pl
SFX pS ssoir ssiéraient/n'q'l'm't's' soir is:cond is:3pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoirais/n'q'j'l'm't' soir is:cond is:1sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoirais/n'q'l'm't' soir is:cond is:2sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoirait/n'q'l'm't's' soir is:cond is:3sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoirions/n'q'l't' soir is:cond is:1pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoiriez/n'q'l'm' soir is:cond is:2pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoiraient/n'q'l'm't's' soir is:cond is:3pl
SFX pS sseoir sseye/n'j'l'm't' seoir is:spre is:1sg
SFX pS sseoir sseyes/n'l'm't' seoir is:spre is:2sg
SFX pS sseoir sseye/n'l'm't's' seoir is:spre is:3sg
SFX pS sseoir sseyions/n'l't' seoir is:spre is:1pl
SFX pS sseoir sseyiez/n'l'm' seoir is:spre is:2pl
SFX pS sseoir sseyent/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:spre is:3pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoie/n'j'l'm't' seoir is:spre is:1sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoies/n'l'm't' seoir is:spre is:2sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoie/n'l'm't's' seoir is:spre is:3sg
SFX pS sseoir ssoyions/n'l't' seoir is:spre is:1pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoyiez/n'l'm' seoir is:spre is:2pl
SFX pS sseoir ssoient/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:spre is:3pl
SFX pS ssoir sseye/n'j'l'm't' soir is:spre is:1sg
SFX pS ssoir sseyes/n'l'm't' soir is:spre is:2sg
SFX pS ssoir sseye/n'l'm't's' soir is:spre is:3sg
SFX pS ssoir sseyions/n'l't' soir is:spre is:1pl
SFX pS ssoir sseyiez/n'l'm' soir is:spre is:2pl
SFX pS ssoir sseyent/n'q'l'm't's' soir is:spre is:3pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoie/n'j'l'm't' soir is:spre is:1sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoies/n'l'm't' soir is:spre is:2sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoie/n'l'm't's' soir is:spre is:3sg
SFX pS ssoir ssoyions/n'l't' soir is:spre is:1pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoyiez/n'l'm' soir is:spre is:2pl
SFX pS ssoir ssoient/n'q'l'm't's' soir is:spre is:3pl
SFX pS sseoir ssisse/n'q'j'l'm't' seoir is:simp is:1sg
SFX pS sseoir ssisses/n'q'l'm't' seoir is:simp is:2sg
SFX pS sseoir ssît/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:simp is:3sg
SFX pS sseoir ssissions/n'q'l't' seoir is:simp is:1pl
SFX pS sseoir ssissiez/n'q'l'm' seoir is:simp is:2pl
SFX pS sseoir ssissent/n'q'l'm't's' seoir is:simp is:3pl
SFX pS ssoir ssisse/n'q'j'l'm't' soir is:simp is:1sg
SFX pS ssoir ssisses/n'q'l'm't' soir is:simp is:2sg
