Atelier/dicollect/fr-dicollecte-daily-classique-reforme1990-v2012-12-27.dic
asseoir/pS() po:v3tp
assoir/pS() po:v3tp
rasseoir/pS() po:v3itp
rassoir/pS() po:v3itp
